incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
    <pardef n="pos__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dha</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agan</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aga</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Nouns -->
  
    <pardef n="mapp/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="can__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>now</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ewnt/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ras</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ro__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>how</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/agh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r>agh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eghyer</l>
          <r>agh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pront/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oryon</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lov/an__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onnow</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mos__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lavr/ak__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egow</l>
          <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="de/th__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhyow</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ap/ern__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ern</l>
          <r>ern<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ronyow</l>
          <r>ern<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/avar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avar</l>
          <r>avar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ever</l>
          <r>avar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/orgh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ergh</l>
          <r>orgh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orgh</l>
          <r>orgh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mow/es__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysy</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="scubel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>low</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/an__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yny</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tow/al__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellow</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gw/edhen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edhen</l>
          <r>edhen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yth</l>
          <r>edhen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fur/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vyow</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Kernow__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yon</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="negys__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/aw__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aw</l>
          <r>aw<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebyon</l>
          <r>aw<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="be/th__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhow</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ascl/ejen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>ejen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejen</l>
          <r>ejen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="possessive pronouns"><i/><par n="pos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="gavar"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/avar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clavyjores"><i>clavyjores</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mowes"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ow</i><par n="mow/es__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carten"><i>carten</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="len"><i>len</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scubel"><i>scubel</i><par n="scubel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="to"><par n="initial-t"/><i>o</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pynta"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ynt</i><par n="mapp/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>esenn</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stenor"><i>stenor</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="can"><i>can</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amser"><i>amser</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pons"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ons</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="canstel"><i>canstel</i><par n="scubel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maw"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/aw__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caderyer"><i>cadery</i><par n="pront/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavrak"><i>lavr</i><par n="lavr/ak__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagha"><i>lagh</i><par n="mapp/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ro"><i>ro</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aven"><i>aven</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ran"><i>ran</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cowethas"><i>cowethas</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apern"><i>ap</i><par n="ap/ern__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mynysen"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ynysen</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ewnter"><i>ewnt</i><par n="ewnt/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steren"><i>steren</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sagh"><i>s</i><par n="s/agh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dywros"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ywros</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tesen"><par n="initial-t"/><i>esen</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trenkenn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>renkenn</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lovan"><i>lov</i><par n="lov/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lur"><i>lur</i><par n="lur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trygva"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rygva</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estren"><i>estren</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tylda"><par n="initial-t"/><i>yld</i><par n="mapp/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bran"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lappyer"><i>lappy</i><par n="pront/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scath"><i>scath</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="towal"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ow</i><par n="tow/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parth"><par n="initial-p"/><i>arth</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torth"><par n="initial-t"/><i>orth</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blejen"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lejen</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penseythen"><par n="initial-p"/><i>enseythen</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yeth"><i>yeth</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mylva"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ylva</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asclejen"><i>ascl</i><par n="ascl/ejen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwariores"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ariores</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorenn"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orenn</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mos"><par n="initial-m"/><i>os</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="losten"><i>losten</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sawses"><i>Sawses</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fos"><i>fos</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mappa"><par n="initial-m"/><i>app</i><par n="mapp/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folen"><i>folen</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ayren"><i>ayren</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lowarth"><i>lowarth</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forn"><i>forn</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cryb"><i>cryb</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pluven"><par n="initial-p"/><i>luven</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="furf"><i>fur</i><par n="fur/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyn"><i>lyn</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="negys"><i>negys</i><par n="negys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estyllen"><i>estyllen</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forgh"><i>f</i><par n="f/orgh__n"/></e>
